Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1106.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 61 O.S. 2021, Section 227, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 227. A. 1. This act shall not apply to:
a. highway construction,
b. railroad construction, or
c. turnpike construction, or
d. municipal road construction.
2. Except as the following may be a portion of a construction
contract as defined in Section 2 222 of this act title, this act
shall not apply to:
a. roads,
b. bridges,
c. utilities,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1106 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

d. traffic control,
e. drainage construction,
f. sanitary sewer construction, or
g. waterline construction.
3. This act shall not apply to any contract relating to a
single-, two-, three-, or four-family dwelling.
B. The following are against the public policy of this state
and are void and unenforceable:
1. A provision, covenant, clause or understanding in,
collateral to or affecting a construction contract that makes the
contract subject to the laws of another state or that requires any
litigation, arbitration or other dispute resolution proceeding
arising from the contract to be conducted in another state; and
2. A provision, covenant, clause or understanding in,
collateral to or affecting a construction contract that disallows or
alters the rights of any prime contractor, subcontractor, sub-
subcontractor, or material supplier to receive and enforce any and
all rights under this act.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON BUSINESS AND INSURANCE
February 20, 2025 - DO PASS




SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1106 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)